Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 4. Payments Due to Deceased State Employees.

Sec. 39.20.360.
Order of payment.

All unpaid compensation due to a deceased employee of the state at the time of death shall be paid to the person or persons surviving at the date of death, in the following order of precedence, and the payment is a bar to recovery by any other person of amounts so paid:

to the beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by the employee in writing to receive the compensation filed with Department of Administration at the time of death; if more than one beneficiary is designated, each shall share equally unless the employee specifies a different allocation or preference;

if there is no beneficiary designated, to the surviving spouse;

if there is no beneficiary or surviving spouse, to the employee’s child or children and descendants of deceased children by representation;

if none of the above, to the employee’s parents, or the survivor of them;

if none of the above, to the legal representative of the employee’s estate, or if there is none, to the person determined to be entitled under the laws of the employee’s domicile.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1964)

Sec. 39.20.370.
Inapplicability of provisions to certain benefits, funds, or interest.

AS

39.20.360

—

39.20.400

do not apply to any benefit, refund, or interest payable under the Public Employees’ Retirement System applicable to the decedent’s service or to an amount the disposition of which is otherwise expressly prescribed by state law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1964)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, the reference in this section to AS

39.20.360

was substituted for a reference to AS

39.20.310

to correct a manifest error in ch. 72, SLA 1964.

Cross references. —

For the Public Employees’ Retirement System, see AS 39.35.

Sec. 39.20.380.
Change or revocation of designation.

The employee may change or revoke a designation made under AS

39.20.360

—

39.20.400

at any time without notice to the beneficiary by written notice filed with the Department of Administration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1964)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, the reference in this section to AS

39.20.360

—

39.20.400

was substituted for a reference to “this chapter” to correct a manifest error in ch. 72, SLA 1964.

Sec. 39.20.390.
Employees to be informed.

Each department shall inform its employees of the provisions of AS

39.20.360

—

39.20.400

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1964)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, the reference in this section to AS

39.20.360

—

39.20.400

was substituted for a reference to “this chapter” to correct a manifest error in ch. 72, SLA 1964.

Sec. 39.20.400.
Definitions.

In AS

39.20.360

—

39.20.400

,

“employee” means a person entitled to receive unpaid compensation from the state;

“unpaid compensation” means the pay, salary, or allowances, or other compensation due on account of the services of the decedent for the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1964)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, the reference in this section to AS

39.20.360

was substituted for a reference to AS

39.20.310

to correct a manifest error in ch. 72, SLA 1964.